District of Columbia statutes.
29-405.07

Record date.

(a)

The articles of incorporation or bylaws may fix or provide the manner of fixing the record date to determine the members entitled to notice of a meeting of the members, to demand a special meeting, to vote, or to take any other action. If the articles or bylaws do not fix or provide for fixing a record date, the board of directors of the membership corporation may fix a future date as the record date.

(b)

A record date fixed under this section shall not be more than 70 days before the meeting or action requiring a determination of members.

(c)

A determination of members entitled to notice of or to vote at a meeting of the members shall be effective for any adjournment of the meeting unless the board of directors fixes a new record date, which it shall do if the meeting is adjourned to a date more than 120 days after the date fixed for the original meeting.

(d)

If a court orders a meeting adjourned to a date more than 120 days after the date fixed for the original meeting, it may provide that the original record date continues in effect or it may fix a new record date.

History

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720

Section References

This section is referenced in § 29-401.02, § 29-401.50, § 29-405.02, § 29-405.04, and § 29-405.05.